Rhode Island, session 2025, SB391.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 91.2
SCHOOL TRAUMA KIT ACT
16-91.2-1. Trauma kits in educational settings.
(a) Every public and private elementary and secondary school within the State of Rhode
Island shall provide and maintain clearly visible and easily accessible trauma kits as described in
subsection (b) of this section. The quantity and type of trauma kits shall be determined by the
commissioner of education, in consultation with the director of the department of health, after due
consideration of trauma-type first aid kits recommended by the Department of Homeland Security,
and shall be adequate to ensure ready and appropriate access for use during emergencies.
(b) Each trauma kit shall include at a minimum the following supplies: tourniquet; gloves
and marker; scissors; instructions; compression bandages; and bleeding control bandages and any
other supplies determined necessary by the director pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of
this section.
(c) Whenever school facilities are used for school-sponsored or school-approved curricular
or extracurricular activities, and whenever a school-sponsored athletic contest is held at any
location, the school officials and administrators responsible for the school facility or athletic contest
shall ensure the presence of at least one person who is properly trained in the administration of first

aid and use of the trauma kit.
(d) No person, whether acting in an official capacity or as a private volunteer, who
gratuitously renders emergency assistance to a person who experiences a traumatic bleeding injury,
shall be liable for civil damages for any personal injuries which result from acts or omissions by
the person rendering the emergency care, which may constitute ordinary negligence; provided,
however that, this immunity applies only to:
(1) Persons who have been trained in accordance with standards promulgated by the US
Department of Homeland Security or the American College of Surgeons Committee on Trauma
(ACS COT) or an equivalent program as approved by the department of health;
(2) Persons providing approved training in traumatic bleeding injuries;
(3) Property lessees and owners where the emergency assistance occurs; and
(4) The owners of the actual life-saving equipment.
(e) Immunity from civil liability pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section,
shall not extend or apply to acts or omissions constituting intentional harm or willful, wanton or
gross negligence.
(f) The director of the department of health is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
(g) Any elementary or secondary school may accept funding for the trauma kits from
grants, 501(c)(3) nonprofit organizations, parent-teacher organizations, private parties and
government entities.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC001405
========
LC001405 - Page 2 of 3